th: ประเภทภาชนะบรรจุน้ำยาทำฟองสบู่: ขวดติดกับตัวเครื่อง; ขวดถอดออกได้; ถาดจุ่ม; ก้านจุ่ม (ในตัว); ก้านจุ่ม (ถอดได้); ถังเก็บน้ำยาในตัว; ตลับเติมน้ำยาสำเร็จรูป; อื่นๆ
nl: Bellenblaasvloeistof containertype: Bevestigde fles; Afneembare fles; Dompelbakje; Dompelstaafje (ingebouwd); Dompelstaafje (verwijderbaar); Intern reservoir; Voorgevulde cartridge; Overig
da: Type af beholder til bobleopløsning: Påsat flaske; Aftagelig flaske; Dypbakke; Dypstav (indbygget); Dypstav (aftagelig); Indvendig beholder; Forudfyldt patron; Andet
tr: Baloncuk solüsyonu hazne tipi: Takılı şişe; Çıkarılabilir şişe; Daldırma tepsisi; Daldırma çubuğu (dahili); Daldırma çubuğu (çıkarılabilir); Dahili hazne; Önceden doldurulmuş kartuş; Diğer
zh-TW: 泡泡水容器類型: 附瓶; 可拆式瓶子; 浸泡托盤; 浸泡棒 (內建); 浸泡棒 (可拆式); 內部儲液槽; 預裝匣; 其他
zh-CN: 泡泡液容器类型: 附带瓶子; 可拆卸瓶子; 浸蘸托盘; 浸蘸棒（内置）; 浸蘸棒（可拆卸）; 内置储液槽; 预装液盒; 其他
de: Behältertyp der Seifenblasenlösung: Befestigte Flasche; Abnehmbare Flasche; Eintauchschale; Eintauchstab (integriert); Eintauchstab (abnehmbar); Interner Behälter; Vorgefüllte Kartusche; Sonstiges
it: Soluzione a bolle tipo cassa: Flacone integrato; Flacone rimovibile; Vaschetta di immersione; Bacchetta di immersione (integrata); Bacchetta di immersione (rimovibile); Serbatoio interno; Cartuccia pre-riempita; Altro
sk-SK: Typ nádoby na bublinový roztok: Pripevnená fľaša; Odnímateľná fľaša; Namáčacia miska; Namáčací prútik (zabudovaný); Namáčací prútik (odnímateľný); Vnútorná nádržka; Vopred naplnená vložka; Iné
el: Τύπος δοχείου διαλύματος φουσκών: Προσαρτημένο μπουκάλι; Αποσπώμενο μπουκάλι; Δίσκος εμβάπτισης; Ραβδί εμβάπτισης (ενσωματωμένο); Ραβδί εμβάπτισης (αφαιρούμενο); Εσωτερικό δοχείο; Προγεμισμένη αμπούλα; Άλλο
ja: 泡状溶液コンテナタイプ: 取り付け型ボトル; 取り外し可能ボトル; ディップトレイ; ディップワンド (内蔵); ディップワンド (取り外し可能); 内蔵タンク; 充填済みカートリッジ; その他
cs: Typ kontejneru s bublinovým roztokem: Připojená láhev; Odnímatelná láhev; Namáčecí miska; Namáčecí hůlka (vestavěná); Namáčecí hůlka (odnímatelná); Vnitřní nádržka; Předplněná kazeta; Jiné
hu: Buborékoldat-tartály típusa: Hozzáerősített flakon; Levehető flakon; Merítőtálca; Merítőpálca (beépített); Merítőpálca (kivehető); Belső tartály; Előretöltött patron; Egyéb
fr: Type de contenant de solution à bulles: Bouteille fixée; Bouteille amovible; Bac de trempage; Baguette de trempage (intégrée); Baguette de trempage (amovible); Réservoir interne; Cartouche préremplie; Autre
bg-BG: Тип контейнер за разтвор с мехурчета: Прикрепена бутилка; Отделяща се бутилка; Тавичка за потапяне; Пръчица за потапяне (вградена); Пръчица за потапяне (подвижна); Вътрешен резервоар; Предварително напълнен пълнител; Друго
vi: Loại thùng đựng dung dịch tạo bong bóng: Bình gắn liền; Bình tháo rời; Khay nhúng; Que nhúng (tích hợp); Que nhúng (tháo rời); Ngăn chứa bên trong; Ống nạp sẵn; Khác
ko: 버블 용액 용기 유형: 부착형 병; 분리형 병; 딥 트레이; 딥 막대(내장형); 딥 막대(분리형); 내부 저장소; 사전 충전된 카트리지; 기타
en: Bubble solution container type: Attached bottle; Detachable bottle; Dip tray; Dip wand (built-in); Dip wand (removable); Internal reservoir; Pre-filled cartridge; Other
ro-RO: Tip de container pentru soluția pentru bule: Sticlă atașată; Sticlă detașabilă; Tavă de scufundare; Baghetă de scufundare (încorporată); Baghetă de scufundare (detașabilă); Rezervor intern; Cartuș preumplut; Altele
es: Tipo de contenedor para la solución de burbujas: Botella incorporada; Botella desmontable; Bandeja de inmersión; Varita de inmersión (integrada); Varita de inmersión (extraíble); Depósito interno; Cartucho precargado; Otro
pt-PT: Tipo de recipiente para solução de bolas de sabão: Garrafa acoplada; Garrafa removível; Tabuleiro de imersão; Aro de imersão (integrado); Aro de imersão (removível); Reservatório interno; Cartucho pré-cheio; Outro
sl-SI: Vrsta vsebnika tekočine za mehurčke: Pritrjena steklenička; Snemljiva steklenička; Pladenj za pomakanje; Palčka za pomakanje (vgrajena); Palčka za pomakanje (snemljiva); Notranji rezervoar; Prednapolnjena kartuša; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de recipiente para solução de bolhas: Frasco acoplado; Frasco destacável; Bandeja de imersão; Bastão de imersão (integrado); Bastão de imersão (removível); Reservatório interno; Cartucho pré-preenchido; Outros
sv: Bubbellösningens behållartyp: Monterad flaska; Löstagbar flaska; Doppbricka; Doppstav (inbyggd); Doppstav (löstagbar); Intern behållare; Förfylld patron; Övrigt
pl: Typ pojemnika na płyn do baniek: Dołączona butelka; Odłączana butelka; Tacka zanurzeniowa; Różdżka do zanurzania (wbudowana); Różdżka do zanurzania (wyjmowana); Wewnętrzny zbiornik; Wstępnie napełniony wkład; Inne
ru: Тип контейнера для раствора для пузырей: Прикрепленная бутылка; Съемная бутылка; Лоток для погружения; Палочка (встроенная); Палочка (съемная); Внутренний резервуар; Предварительно заполненный картридж; Другое
nb: Betraktertype for bobleløsning: Fastmontert flaske; Avtakbar flaske; Dyppeskål; Dyppepinne (innebygd); Dyppepinne (avtakbar); Innvendig beholder; Forhåndsfylt patron; Annet
fi: Saippuaveden säiliön tyyppi: Kiinnitetty pullo; Irrotettava pullo; Upotusalusta; Upotussauva (sisäänrakennettu); Upotussauva (irrotettava); Sisäinen säiliö; Esitäytetty patruuna; Muu
lt-LT: Burbulų skysčio talpyklos tipas: Pritvirtintas buteliukas; Nuimamas buteliukas; Merkiamas padėkliukas; Merkiamas žiedelis (įmontuotas); Merkiamas žiedelis (išimamas); Vidinis rezervuaras; Iš anksto užpildyta kasetė; Kitas
hr-HR: Spremnik za mjehuriće s otopinom: Pričvršćena bočica; Odvojiva bočica; Pladanj za umakanje; Štapić za umakanje (ugrađen); Štapić za umakanje (odvojiv); Unutarnji spremnik; Unaprijed napunjeni uložak; Ostalo